Idaho statutes. Title 37 FOOD, DRUGS, AND OIL
Chapter 27 UNIFORM CONTROLLED SUBSTANCES
§ 37-2709. Schedule III.

Schedule III shall consist of the drugs and other substances, by whatever official name, common or usual name, chemical name, or brand name designated, listed in this section.

Stimulants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers, (whether optical or geometric), and salts of such isomers whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:

Those compounds, mixtures, or preparations in dosage unit form containing any stimulant substances listed in schedule II which compounds, mixtures, or preparations were listed as excepted compounds under 21 CFR 1308.32, and any other drug of the quantitative composition shown in that list for those drugs or which is the same except that it contains a lesser quantity of controlled substances.

Benzphetamine;

Chlorphentermine;

Clortermine;

Phendimetrazine.

Depressants. Unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances having a potential for abuse associated with a depressant effect on the central nervous system:

Any compound, mixture or preparation containing:

Any suppository dosage form containing:

Any substance which contains any quantity of a derivative of barbituric acid or any salt thereof, including, but not limited to:

Chlorhexadol;

Embutramide;

Any drug product containing gamma hydroxybutyric acid, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, for which an application is approved under section 505 of the federal food, drug, and cosmetic act;

Ketamine, its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers — 7285. (Some other names for ketamine: (+/-)-2-(2-chlorophenyl)-2-(methylamino)-cyclohexanone).

Lysergic acid;

Lysergic acid amide;

Methyprylon;

Perampanel, and its salts, isomers and salts of isomers;

Sulfondiethylmethane;

Sulfonethylmethane;

Sulfonmethane;

Tiletamine and zolazepam or any salt thereof.

Nalorphine.

Narcotic drugs. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule:

Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation containing limited quantities of any of the following narcotic drugs, or any salts thereof:

Not more than 1.8 grams of codeine, or any of its salts, per 100 milliliters or not more than 90 milligrams per dosage unit, with an equal or greater quantity of an isoquinoline alkaloid of opium;

Not more than 1.8 grams of codeine, or any of its salts, per 100 milliliters or not more than 90 milligrams per dosage unit, with one (1) or more active, nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts;

Not more than 1.8 grams of dihydrocodeine, or any of its salts, per 100 milliliters or not more than 90 milligrams per dosage unit, with one (1) or more active, nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts;

Not more than 300 milligrams of ethylmorphine, or any of its salts, per 100 milliliters or not more than 15 milligrams per dosage unit, with one (1) or more ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts;

Not more than 500 milligrams of opium per 100 milliliters or per 100 grams, or not more than 25 milligrams per dosage unit, with one (1) or more active, nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts;

Not more than 50 milligrams of morphine, or any of its salts, per 100 milliliters or per 100 grams with one (1) or more active, nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts.

Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation containing any of the following narcotic drugs or their salts, as set forth below:

Buprenorphine.

[Reserved].

Anabolic steroids and human growth hormones. Any drug or hormonal substance, chemically and pharmacologically related to testosterone (other than estrogens, progestins and corticosteroids) that promotes muscle growth including any salt, ester or isomer of a drug or substance listed in this subsection, if that salt, ester or isomer promotes muscle growth.

13beta-ethyl-17beta-hydroxygon-4-en-3-one;

17alpha-methyl-3alpha, 17beta-dihydroxy-5alpha-androstane;

17alpha-methyl-3beta, 17beta-dihydroxy-5alpha-androstane;

17alpha-methyl-3beta,17beta-dihydroxyandrost-4-ene;

17alpha-methyl-4-hydroxynandrolone;

17alpha-methyl-delta1-dihydrotestosterone;

19-nor-4-androstenediol;

19-nor-4-androstenedione;

19-nor-4,9(10)-androstadienedione;

19-nor-5-androstenediol;

19-nor-5-androstenedione;

1-androstenediol;

1-androstenedione;

3alpha,17beta-dihydroxy-5alpha-androstane;

3beta,17beta-dihydroxy-5alpha-androstane;

4-androstenediol;

4-androstenedione;

4-hydroxy-19-nortestosterone;

4-hydroxytestosterone;

5-androstenediol;

5-androstenedione;

Androstenedione;

Bolasterone;

Boldenone;

Boldione;

Calusterone;

Chlorotestosterone (4-chlorotestosterone);

Clostebol;

Dehydrochlormethyltestosterone;

Delta1-dihydrotestosterone;

Desoxymethyltestosterone;

Dihydrotestosterone (4-dihydrotestosterone);

Drostanolone;

Ethylestrenol;

Fluoxymesterone;

Formebulone;

Furazabol;

Human growth hormones;

Mestanolone;

Mesterolone;

Methandienone;

Methandranone;

Methandriol;

Methandrostenolone;

Methasterone (2a, 17a-dimethyl-5a-androstan-17=beta-ol-3-one);

Methenolone;

Methyldienolone;

Methyltestosterone;

Methyltrienolone;
(50) Mibolerone;

Hallucinogenic substances.

Dronabinol (synthetic) in sesame oil and encapsulated in a soft gelatin capsule in the federal Food and Drug Administration approved product — 7369. (Some other names for dronabinol: (6aR-trans)-6a,7,8,10a- tetrahydro-6,6,9-trimethyl-3-pentyl-6H-dibenzo [b,d]pyran-1-ol or (-)-delta-9-(trans)-tetrahydrocannabinol).

The board may except by rule any compound, mixture, or preparation containing any stimulant or depressant substance listed in subsection (b) or (c) of this section from the application of all or any part of this act if the compound, mixture, or preparation contains one (1) or more active medicinal ingredients not having a stimulant or depressant effect on the central nervous system, and if the admixtures are included therein in combinations, quantity, proportion, or concentration that vitiate the potential for abuse of the substances which have a stimulant or depressant effect on the central nervous system.

i. Amobarbital;

ii. Secobarbital;

iii. Pentobarbital or any salt thereof and one (1) or more other active medicinal ingredients which are not listed in any schedule.

i. Amobarbital;

ii. Secobarbital;

iii. Pentobarbital or any salt of any of these drugs and approved by the Food and Drug Administration for marketing only as a suppository.

i. Aprobarbital;

ii. Butabarbital (secbutabarbital);

iii. Butalbital, excluding drug products exempted by the federal drug enforcement administration (DEA);

iv. Butobarbital (butethal);

v. Talbutal;

vi. Thiamylal;

vii. Thiopental;

viii. Vinbarbital.

(51) Nandrolone;

(52) Norbolethone;

(53) Norclostebol;

(54) Norethandrolone;

(55) Normethandrolone;

(56) Oxandrolone;

(57) Oxymesterone;

(58) Oxymetholone;

(59) Prostanozol (17=beta-hydroxy-5a-androstano[3,2-c]pyrazole);

(60) Stanolone;

(61) Stanozolol;

(62) Stenbolone;

(63) Testolactone;

(64) Testosterone;

(65) Testosterone cypionate;

(66) Testosterone enanthate;

(67) Testosterone propionate;

(68) Tetrahydrogestrinone;

(69) Trenbolone.

Anabolic steroids that are expressly intended for administration through implants or injection to cattle or other nonhuman species, and that are approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration for such use, shall not be classified as controlled substances under this act and shall not be governed by its provisions.

In addition to the penalties prescribed in article IV of the uniform controlled substances act, any person shall be guilty of a felony who prescribes, dispenses, supplies, sells, delivers, manufactures or possesses with the intent to prescribe, dispense, supply, sell, deliver or manufacture anabolic steroids or any other human growth hormone for purposes of enhancing performance in an exercise, sport or game or hormonal manipulation intended to increase muscle mass, strength or weight without a medical necessity as determined by a physician.

§ 37-2710. Schedule IV tests.

The board shall place a substance in schedule IV if it finds that:

The substance has a low potential for abuse relative to substances in schedule III;

The substance has currently accepted medical use in treatment in the United States; and

Abuse of the substance may lead to limited physical dependence or psychological dependence relative to the substances in schedule III.

§ 37-2711. Schedule IV.

Schedule IV shall consist of the drugs and other substances, by whatever official name, common or usual name, chemical name, or brand name designated, listed in this section.

Narcotic drugs. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation containing any of the following narcotic drugs, or their salts calculated as the free anhydrous base or alkaloid, in limited quantities as set forth below:

No more than 1 milligram of difenoxin and not less than 25 micrograms of atropine sulfate per dosage unit;

Dextropropoxyphene (alpha-(+)-4-dimethylamino-1, 2-diphenyl- 3-methyl-2-propionoxybutane).

2-[(dimethylamino)methyl]-1-(3-methoxyphenyl)cyclohexanol (including tramadol), including its salts, optical and geometric isomers, and salts of isomers.

Depressants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:

Alfaxalone 5[alpha]-pregnan-3[alpha]-ol-11,20-dione;

Alprazolam;

Barbital;

Bromazepam;

Camazepam;

Carisprodol;

Chloral betaine;

Chloral hydrate;

Chlordiazepoxide;

Clobazam;

Clonazepam;

Clorazepate;

Clotiazepam;

Cloxazolam;

Delorazepam;

Diazepam;

Dichloralphenazone;

Estazolam;

Ethchlorvynol;

Ethinamate;

Ethyl loflazepate;

Fludiazepam;

Flurazepam;

Fospropofol;

Halazepam;

Haloxazolam;
(27) Ketazolam;

Lormetazepam;

Mebutamate;

Medazepam;

Meprobamate;

Methohexital;

Methylphenobarbital (mephobarbital);

Midazolam;

Nimetazepam;

Nitrazepam;

Nordiazepam;

Oxazepam;

Oxazolam;

Paraldehyde;

Petrichloral;

Phenobarbital;

Pinazepam;

Prazepam;

Quazepam;

Suvorexant;

Temazepam;

Tetrazepam;

Triazolam;

Zaleplon;

Zolpidem;

Zopiclone.

Fenfluramine — Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances, including its salts, isomers (whether optical, position, or geometric), and salts of such isomers, whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible:

Dexfenfluramine;

Fenfluramine.

Stimulants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers (whether optical, position, or geometric), and salts of such isomers whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:

Cathine ((+)-norpseudoephedrine);

Diethylpropion;

Fencamfamin;

Fenproporex;

Lorcaserin;

Mazindol;

Mefenorex;

Modafinil;

Pemoline (including organometallic complexes and chelates thereof);

Phentermine;

Pipradrol;

Sibutramine;

SPA ((-)-1-dimethylamino-1,2-diphenylethane).

Other substances. Unless specifically excepted, or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances, including its salts:

Pentazocine;

Butorphanol (including its optical isomers);

Eluxadoline (5-[[[(2S)-2-amino-3-[4-aminocarbonyl)-2,6-dimethylphenyl]-1-ox opropyl] [(1S)-1-(4-phenyl-1H-imidazol-2-yl)ethyl] amino]methyl]-2-methoxybenzoic acid) (including its optical isomers) and its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers.

The board may except by rule any compound, mixture, or preparation containing any depressant substance listed in subsection (c) of this section from the application of all or any part of this act if the compound, mixture, or preparation contains one (1) or more active medicinal ingredients not having a depressant effect on the central nervous system, and if the admixtures are included therein in combinations, quantity, proportion, or concentration that vitiate the potential for abuse of the substances which have a depressant effect on the central nervous system.

(28) Loprazolam;

(29) Lorazepam;

§ 37-2712. Schedule V tests.

The board shall place a substance in schedule V if it finds that:

The substance has low potential for abuse relative to the controlled substances listed in schedule IV;

The substance has currently accepted medical use in treatment in the United States; and

The substance has limited physical dependence or psychological dependence liability relative to the controlled substances listed in schedule IV.

§ 37-2713. Schedule V.

Schedule V shall consist of the drugs and other substances, by whatever official name, common or usual name, chemical name, or brand name designated, listed in this section.

Narcotic drugs. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation containing any of the following narcotic drugs and their salts, as set forth below.

Narcotic drugs containing nonnarcotic active medicinal ingredients. Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing any of the following limited quantities of narcotic drugs or salts thereof, which shall include one (1) or more nonnarcotic active medicinal ingredients in sufficient proportion to confer upon the compound, mixture, or preparation, valuable medicinal qualities other than those possessed by the narcotic drug alone:

Not more than 200 milligrams of codeine per 100 milliliters or per 100 grams;

Not more than 100 milligrams of dihydrocodeine per 100 milliliters or per 100 grams;

Not more than 100 milligrams of ethylmorphine per 100 milliliters or per 100 grams;

Not more than 2.5 milligrams of diphenoxylate and not less than 25 micrograms of atropine sulfate per dosage unit;

Not more than 100 milligrams of opium per 100 milliliters or per 100 grams;

Not more than 0.5 milligrams difenoxin and not less than 25 micrograms of atropine sulfate per dosage unit.

Other substances. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances, including its salts:

Brivaracetam ((2S)-2-[(4R)-2-oxo-4-propylpyrrolidin-1-yl]butanamide) (also referred to as BRV; UCB-34714; Briviact) (including its salts);

Ezogabine [N-[2-amino-4-(4-fluorobenzylamino)-phenyl]-carbamic acid ethyl ester]-2779;

Lacosamide;

Pregabalin;

Pyrovalerone.

Approved cannabidiol drugs. A drug product in finished dosage formulation that has been approved by the U.S. food and drug administration that contains cannabidiol (2-[1R-3-methyl-6R-(1-methylethenyl)-2-cyclohexen-1-yl]-5-penty l-1,3- benzenediol) derived from cannabis and no more than 0.1 percent (w/w) residual tetrahydrocannabinols.

§ 37-2713A. Schedule VI.

Schedule VI shall consist of the drugs and other substances, by whatever official name, common or usual name, chemical name or brand name designated, listed in this section.

Volatile nitrites. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture or preparation containing any of the following drugs or their related compounds, congeners or isomers as follows:

Amyl nitrite;

Butyl nitrite;

Isobutyl nitrite;

Isoamyl nitrite;

Isopentyl nitrite.

Except that any combination or compound containing amyl nitrite which is prepared pursuant to a prescription issued by a licensed practitioner is not a controlled substance for the purpose of this section.

§ 37-2714. Republishing of schedules. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2018, ch. 36, § 2, effective July 1, 2018.

§ 37-2715. Rules.

The board may promulgate rules and charge reasonable fees relating to the registration and control of the manufacture, distribution, and dispensing of controlled substances within this state.

§ 37-2716. Registration requirements.

Every person who manufactures, distributes, prescribes, administers, dispenses, or conducts research with any controlled substance within this state shall obtain annually a registration issued by the board in accordance with this chapter and its rules.

Every prescriber, except veterinarians, shall also register with the board to obtain online access to the controlled substances prescriptions database.

Persons registered by the board under this chapter may possess, manufacture, distribute, dispense, prescribe, administer, or conduct research with those substances to the extent authorized by their registration and licensing entity and in conformity with the other provisions of this chapter.

The following persons need not register and may lawfully possess controlled substances under this chapter:

An agent or employee of any person registered pursuant to this chapter, if he is acting in the usual course of his business or employment;

A common or contract carrier or warehouseman, or an employee thereof, whose possession of any controlled substance is in the usual course of business or employment;

An ultimate user or a person in possession of any controlled substance pursuant to a lawful order of a practitioner or in lawful possession of a schedule V substance.

The board may waive by rule the requirement for registration of certain persons if it finds it consistent with the public health and safety.

A separate registration is required at each principal place of business or professional practice where the applicant manufactures, distributes, administers, dispenses, or conducts research with controlled substances, except a separate registration is not required under this chapter for practitioners engaging in research with nonnarcotic controlled substances in schedules II through IV where the practitioner is already registered under this chapter in another capacity.

Practitioners registered under federal law to conduct research with schedule I substances may conduct research with schedule I substances within this state upon registering in Idaho and furnishing the board with evidence of the practitioner’s federal registration.

The board may inspect the establishment of a registrant or applicant for registration in accordance with this chapter and board rule.

§ 37-2717. Registration.

The board shall register an applicant to manufacture, prescribe, administer, dispense, distribute or conduct research with controlled substances included in sections 37-2705, 37-2707, 37-2709, 37-2711 and 37-2713, Idaho Code, unless it determines that the issuance of that registration would be inconsistent with the public interest. In determining the public interest, the board shall consider the following factors:

Maintenance of effective controls against diversion of controlled substances into other than legitimate medical, scientific, or industrial channels;

Compliance with applicable state and local law;

Any convictions of the applicant under any federal and state laws relating to any controlled substance;

Past experience in the manufacture, dispensing, prescribing, administering, research or distribution of controlled substances, and the existence in the applicant’s establishment of effective controls against diversions;

Furnishing by the applicant of false or fraudulent material in any application filed under this chapter;

Restriction, suspension or revocation of the applicant’s federal registration; and

Any other factors relevant to and consistent with the public health and safety.

§ 37-2718. Discipline.

A registration under section 37-2717, Idaho Code, may be restricted, suspended or revoked by the board upon a finding that the registrant:

Has furnished false or fraudulent material information in any application filed under this act;

Has been found guilty of a felony or misdemeanor under any state or federal law relating to any controlled substance;

Has had his federal registration restricted, suspended or revoked; or

Has violated this chapter, any rule of the board promulgated under this act, an order of the board or any federal regulation relating to controlled substances; provided, however, that no restriction, revocation or suspension procedure be initiated under this paragraph without the board first giving notice of the procedure to the state licensing board with authority over the registrant’s professional license.

The notice required in subsection (a) (4) of this section shall be given immediately in the event action is taken without an order to show cause as allowed under section 37-2719(b), Idaho Code. In all other cases, such notice shall be given as early as reasonably practicable without risking compromise of the board’s investigation but no later than the earlier of:

Issuance of an order to show cause under section 37-2719(a), Idaho Code; or

Setting of a hearing for approval of a resolution of the matter through informal proceedings.

Restriction, revocation or suspension procedures arising solely from “practice-related issues” shall be referred by the board to such registrant’s state licensing board.

Upon such referral, the registrant’s state licensing board shall commence such investigation of the referred matter as it deems necessary and shall take action upon the registrant’s license or shall inform the board of pharmacy, in writing, that it has investigated the referred matter and has concluded that no action is necessary.

For purposes of this section, the term “practice-related issues” refers to issues involving questions regarding the professional conduct of the registrant within the scope of the registrant’s profession.

The board may limit the revocation or suspension of a registration to the particular controlled substance with respect to which grounds for revocation or suspension exist.

If the board restricts, suspends or revokes a registration, all pertinent controlled substances owned or possessed by the registrant at the time of the restriction or suspension or the effective date of the revocation order may be placed under seal. No disposition may be made of substances under seal until the time for taking an appeal has elapsed or until all appeals have been concluded unless a court, upon application therefor, orders the sale of perishable substances and the deposit of the proceeds of the sale with the court. Upon a revocation order becoming final, all controlled substances may be forfeited to the state.

The board shall promptly notify the bureau and the state licensing board with authority over the registrant’s professional license of all orders restricting, suspending or revoking registration and all forfeitures of controlled substances.

In the event the drug enforcement administration or a state licensing board with authority over a registrant’s professional license or registration takes an action against the registrant in any fashion which suspends, restricts, limits or affects the registrant’s ability to manufacture, distribute, prescribe, administer, dispense, or conduct research with any controlled substance, the professional licensing board shall promptly notify the board of pharmacy of the action.
(1) Upon such action, the board of pharmacy shall be authorized to issue its order suspending, restricting, limiting or otherwise affecting the registrant’s controlled substance registration in the same fashion as the professional licensing board action.

(2) The board of pharmacy order may be issued without further hearing or proceeding, but shall be subject to the effect of any reversal or modification of the professional licensing board action by reason of any appeal or rehearing.

§ 37-2719. Order to show cause.

Except as set forth in section 37-2718(g), Idaho Code, before denying, restricting, suspending or revoking a registration, or refusing a renewal of registration, the board shall serve upon the applicant or registrant an order to show cause why the registration should be restricted, denied, revoked, or suspended, or why the renewal should be refused. The order to show cause shall contain a statement of the basis therefor and shall call upon the applicant or registrant to appear before the board at a time and place not less than thirty (30) days after the date of service of the order, but in the case of a denial or renewal of registration the show cause order shall be served not later than thirty (30) days before the expiration of the registration. These proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, without regard to any criminal prosecution or other proceeding. Proceedings to refuse renewal of registration shall not abate the existing registration which shall remain in effect pending the outcome of the administrative hearing.

The board may suspend, without an order to show cause, any registration simultaneously with the institution of proceedings under section 37-2718, Idaho Code, or where renewal of registration is refused, if it finds that there is an imminent danger to the public health or safety which warrants this action. The suspension shall continue in effect until the conclusion of the proceedings, including judicial review thereof, unless sooner withdrawn by the board or dissolved by a court of competent jurisdiction.

In conjunction with a proceeding for denying, restricting, suspending or revoking a registration, or refusing a renewal of registration, and upon a finding of grounds for such denial, restriction, suspension, revocation or refusal to renew, the board may also impose an administrative fine not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000) per occurrence and the costs of prosecution and administrative costs of bringing the action including, but not limited to, attorney’s fees and costs and costs of hearing transcripts.

§ 37-2720. Records — Drug storage — Inventory.

Persons registered under this chapter shall keep records, store controlled substances and maintain inventories in conformance with the recordkeeping, storage and inventory requirements of federal law and with any additional rules the board issues.

§ 37-2721. Order forms. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2018, ch. 36, § 3, effective July 1, 2018. For present comparable provisions, see§ 37-2722.

§ 37-2722. Issuing, distributing, and dispensing of controlled substances.

No person shall issue or dispense a prescription drug order for a controlled substance unless it is in compliance with applicable state and federal law and rules of the board.

Controlled substances included in schedule I shall be distributed only by a registrant to another registrant pursuant to the federal drug enforcement administration (DEA) order form 222.

Controlled substances included in schedule II shall:

Be distributed only by a registrant to another registrant pursuant to DEA order form 222.

Be dispensed only pursuant to a valid prescription drug order, except when dispensed directly by a prescriber.

Not be refilled.

Include a quantity that is both spelled out in English and written in numerical form, when a written prescription drug order is required.

Controlled substances included in schedule III or IV shall:

Be dispensed only pursuant to a valid prescription drug order, except when dispensed directly by a prescriber.

Not be filled or refilled more than six (6) months after the date thereof or be refilled more than five (5) times, unless renewed by the practitioner.

Controlled substances included in schedule V shall not be distributed or dispensed other than for a medical purpose.

A pharmacist may dispense a controlled substance pursuant to a valid prescription drug order of an individual licensed in a jurisdiction other than the state of Idaho as long as the individual is acting within the jurisdiction, scope and authority of his license.

Prior to issuing to a patient a prescription for outpatient use for an opioid analgesic or benzodiazepine listed in schedule II, III, or IV, the prescriber or the prescriber’s delegate shall review the patient’s prescription drug history for the preceding twelve (12) months from the prescription drug monitoring program and evaluate the data for indicators of prescription drug diversion or misuse. This review is not required:

For patients:

Receiving treatment in an inpatient setting;

At the scene of an emergency or in an ambulance;

In hospice care; or

In a skilled nursing home care facility; or

For a prescription in a quantity intended to last no more than three (3) days.

Subsection (f) of this section shall be effective on and after October 1, 2020, and shall apply only to individuals required by this chapter to register for the prescription drug monitoring program.

§ 37-2723. Form and contents of prescription. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2018, ch. 36, § 5, effective July 1, 2018. For present comparable provisions, see§ 37-2722.

§ 37-2724. Use in hospital — Form of order — Record

Nursing home, extended care facility. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2018, ch. 36, § 6, effective July 1, 2018. For present comparable provisions, see§ 37-2722.

§ 37-2725. Prescription drug order blanks.

Paper prescription drug order blanks shall comply with federal law and shall utilize noncopyable paper that contains security provisions against copying that results in some indication on the copy that it is a copy and therefore rendering it null and void.

Prescription drug order blanks shall not be transferable. Any person possessing any such blank otherwise than is herein provided is guilty of a misdemeanor.

The prescription drug order blank shall contain the name and address of the prescriber. Prescription drug order blanks may contain the printed names of multiple prescribers who are affiliated; provided however, such prescription drug order blanks shall contain a means, in addition to the signature of the prescriber, such as a box or a check, for clear identification of the printed name and address of the prescriber issuing the prescription.

Prescriptions written by a prescriber in an institutional facility or other health care facility in which a prescriber may attend a patient, other than his or her regular place of business, may be written on prescription drug order blanks kept or provided by that facility that contain the name and address of that facility, but not necessarily of the prescriber, provided the prescriber’s name must be stamped, written or printed on the completed prescription in a manner that is legible to a pharmacist.

Failure of a prescriber to clearly mark the prescriber’s printed name and address on the prescription as required in subsection (3) of this section, or to stamp, write or print the prescriber’s name legibly as required in subsection (4) of this section shall subject the prescriber to appropriate discipline by the board.

Prescription drug order blanks or drugs lost or stolen must be immediately reported to the board.

§ 37-2726. Filing prescriptions — Database.

All controlled substances, and opioid antagonists as defined in section 54-1733B, Idaho Code, dispensed for humans shall be filed with the board electronically in a format established by the board or by other method as required by board rule. The board may require the filing of other prescriptions by board rule. The board shall establish by rule the information to be submitted pursuant to the purposes of this section and the purposes set forth in section 37-2730A, Idaho Code.

The board shall create, operate and maintain a controlled substances prescriptions database containing the information submitted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section to be used for the purposes and subject to the terms, conditions and immunities described in section 37-2730A, Idaho Code. The board shall retain the information submitted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section for a period of five (5) years from the date the controlled substance was dispensed. The database information must be made available only to the following:

Authorized individuals employed by Idaho’s boards or other states’ licensing entities charged with the licensing and discipline of practitioners;

Peace officers employed by federal, state and local law enforcement agencies engaged as a specified duty of their employment in enforcing law regulating controlled substances;

Authorized individuals under the direction of the department of health and welfare for the purpose of monitoring and enforcing that department’s responsibilities under the public health, medicare and medicaid laws;

A practitioner, licensed in Idaho or another state, having authority to prescribe controlled substances, or a delegate under the practitioner’s supervision, to the extent the information relates specifically to a current patient of the practitioner to whom the practitioner is prescribing or considering prescribing any controlled substance;

A pharmacist, licensed in Idaho or another state, having authority to dispense controlled substances, or a delegate under the pharmacist’s supervision, to the extent the information relates specifically to a current patient to whom that pharmacist is dispensing or considering dispensing any controlled substance, or providing pharmaceutical care as defined in the Idaho pharmacy act;

An individual who is the recipient of a dispensed controlled substance entered into the database may access records that pertain to that individual, upon the production of positive identification, or that individual’s designee upon production of a notarized release of information by that individual;

Upon a lawful order issued by the presiding judge in a court of competent jurisdiction for the release of prescription monitoring program records of a named individual;

Prosecuting attorneys, deputy prosecuting attorneys and special prosecutors of a county or city and special assistant attorneys general from the office of the attorney general engaged in enforcing law regulating controlled substances; and

A medical examiner or coroner who is an officer of or employed by a state or local government, for determining a cause of death or for performing other duties authorized by law.

The board shall require pharmacists and prescribers, except veterinarians, to annually register with the board to obtain online access to the controlled substances prescriptions database.
(4) The board must maintain records on the information disclosed from the database, including:

The identification of each individual who requests or receives information from the database and who that individual represents;

The information provided to each such individual; and

The date and time the information is requested or provided.

(5) The board shall promulgate rules to ensure that only authorized individuals have access to the database.

(6) The board shall limit to four (4) the number of delegates that a practitioner or pharmacist may permit to access the database under the practitioner’s or pharmacist’s supervision.

(7) Any person who knowingly misrepresents to the board that he is a person entitled under subsection (2) of this section to receive information from the controlled substances prescriptions database under the conditions therein provided, and who receives information from the controlled substances prescriptions database resulting from that misrepresentation, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed six (6) months, or by a fine not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000), or both. The foregoing criminal penalty is in addition to, and not in lieu of, any other civil or administrative penalty or sanction authorized by law.

(8) Any person in possession, whether lawfully or unlawfully, of information from the controlled substances prescriptions database that identifies an individual patient and who knowingly discloses such information to a person not authorized to receive or use such information under any state or federal law or rule or regulation, or the lawful order of a court of competent jurisdiction, or written authorization of the individual patient shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed six (6) months, or by a fine not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000), or both. The foregoing criminal penalty is in addition to, and not in lieu of, any other civil or administrative penalty or sanction authorized by law. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to disclosure of individual patient information by the patient himself. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to disclosure of information by a prosecuting attorney, deputy prosecuting attorney or special prosecutor of a county or city or by a special assistant attorney general from the office of the attorney general in the course of a criminal proceeding, whether preconviction or postconviction.

(9) Any person with access to the board’s online prescription monitoring program pursuant to a board-issued user account, login name and password who intentionally shares or recklessly fails to safeguard his user account, login name and password, resulting in another person not authorized to receive or use such information under the provisions of any state or federal law, rule or regulation obtaining information from the controlled substances prescriptions database, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed six (6) months or by a fine not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000), or both. The foregoing criminal penalty is in addition to, and not in lieu of, any other civil or administrative penalty or sanction authorized by law.

(10) The board may, at its discretion, block access to certain controlled substances prescriptions database data if the board has reason to believe that access to the data is or may be used illegally.

(11) All costs associated with recording and submitting data as required in this section are assumed by the dispensing practitioner recording and submitting the data.
(12) For purposes of this section, “delegate” means a nurse, medical or office assistant, current student of a health profession if a licensed practitioner or registered graduate of such profession may access the database, or a registered pharmacy technician who is designated by a supervising practitioner or pharmacist to access the database according to the provisions of this section and who must register with the state board of pharmacy for such access.